Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 23 Municipal Elections

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision requiring the consent of the electors with reference to organization of municipalities, see art. 13, § 2, Wyo. Const. See, also, art. 3, § 52, Wyo. Const.

Law reviews. —

For article, “No Home On the Range For Home Rule,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 791 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d Elections § 1 et seq.

“At-large” elections as violation of § 2 of Voting Rights Act of 1965 (42 USC § 1973), 92 ALR Fed 824.

29 C.J.S. Elections § 1 et seq.; 62 C.J.S. Municipal Corporations § 350 et seq.